Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.245

Awards of procurement contracts to office of minority and women's business enterprises.

(1) All contracts entered into and purchases made, including leasing or renting, under this chapter on or after September 1, 1983, are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.19 RCW.

(2) All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or after June 10, 2010, are subject to the requirements established under RCW 43.60A.200.

(3) All contracts with the state for goods or services entered into under this chapter on or after January 1, 2024, are subject to the requirements established under RCW 49.60.530.

[ 2023 c 468 s 2; 2010 c 5 s 6; 1983 c 120 s 13. Formerly RCW 43.19.536.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Construction—2010 c 5: See notes following RCW 43.60A.010.

Effective date—Applicability—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—1983 c 120: See RCW 39.19.910, 39.19.920.